Hawaii statutes.
[§321-345.5] Child death
reviews; reports. (a) The director shall submit an annual written report
to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of each
regular session on the status of child death reviews conducted by the department
pursuant to this part. The annual report shall cover
the calendar year immediately prior to the year in which the report is due and
shall describe the total number of child deaths in Hawaii and the causes of
those deaths, the number of deaths of children in state custody and the causes
of those deaths, any child death review activities conducted by the department,
trends in child deaths, and recommendations for system changes, including any
proposed legislation.

(b) Upon written
request of the director, a state or county agency shall report deaths of
children in the custody of the state or county agency to the department,
including any information on the circumstances of the child's death deemed
relevant by the director.

(c) The director
shall submit a copy of any other child death review report published by the
department, including findings and recommendations resulting from such a
review, to the legislature upon the report's publication. [L 2016, c 203, §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next